California, session 20252026, AB2153.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2226 of the Elections Code, as amended by Section 6 of Chapter 262 of the Statutes of 2019, is repealed.2226.(a)Based on change-of-address information received pursuant to Sections 2220 to 2225, inclusive, or change-of-address information provided directly by the voter, the county elections official shall take the following actions as appropriate:(1)If the information indicates the voter has moved to a new residence address in California, the county elections official shall immediately update the voter’s registration record.(2)If the mailings have been returned as undeliverable, or if NCOA, Operation Mail, a returned mailing, or postal service change-of-address data received from a nonforwardable mailing indicates that the voter has moved and left no forwarding address, or if any of these sources indicate that a voter has moved out of the state, the county elections official shall update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive. Voters with an inactive voter registration status do not receive election materials and are not included in calculations to determine the number of signatures required for qualification of candidates and measures, precinct size, or other election administration-related processes.(3)If a voter’s registration status is inactive based on the voter’s failure to confirm the voter’s address pursuant to Section 2224, the county elections official shall send a forwardable address verification mailing, as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 2225. The voter registration record of a voter who fails to respond to the address verification mailing, and who does not offer to vote or vote at any election between the date of the mailing described in Section 2225 and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, shall be canceled.(b)The voter registration record of a voter whose status is inactive for failure to respond to an address verification mailing required by subdivision (c) of Section 2225, and who does not offer to vote or vote at any election between the date of the mailing and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, shall be canceled.(c)A voter who has a registration status of inactive, who offers to vote at any election between the date of the verification mailing required by subdivision (c) of Section 2225 and two federal general elections after the date of that mailing, or who notifies the elections official of a continued residency, shall have the voter’s voter registration status updated to active.(d)All address updates, cancellations, and active and inactive transactions made to voter registration records pursuant to this section shall be reflected on the voter list as required by Section 2191.(e)This section shall remain in effect only until the date that the Secretary of State certifies that the state’s statewide voter registration database, which was developed in compliance with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), has been modified to notify county elections officials when a voter confirms the voter’s registration record on the Secretary of State’s internet website, and as of that date is repealed.